Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2183
Sale; order; place held.

If satisfied with such report the court shall cause an order to be entered directing the referee or referees to sell the premises so situated, and shall also fix the place and terms of sale. The sale may be held at any place in the county in which the action is brought, or if there is land situated in two or more counties, sale may be had in any county in which any part of the real estate is situated.

R.S.1867, Code § 815, p. 539;

R.S.1913, § 8298;

Laws 1917, c. 142, § 1, p. 328;

C.S.1922, § 9251;

C.S.1929, § 20-2183;

R.S.1943, § 25-2183;

Laws 1949, c. 58, § 1, p. 169.

The effect of this section, in connection with section 25-2181, is to make uncertain whether property should be partitioned in kind or sold and the proceeds distributed, until a judicial determination of that issue is made by the court. Trowbridge v. Donner, 152 Neb. 206, 40 N.W.2d 655 (1950).